Utah statutes.
78A-2-103.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Administrator" means the administrator of the courts appointed under Section 78A-2-105.

(2)  "Conference" means the annual statewide judicial conference established by Section 78A-2-111.

(3)  "Council" means the Judicial Council established by Article VIII, Sec. 12, Utah Constitution.

(4)  "Courts" mean all courts of this state, including all courts of record and not of record.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

